hyph-utf8/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/ptex/hyph-sq.ec.tex
% pTeX-friendly hyphenation patterns
%
% language: albanian (sq)
% encoding: ec
%
% This file has been auto-generated from hyph-sq.tex
% with a script [texmf]/scripts/generic/hyph-utf8/generate-ptex-patterns.rb
% See the original file for details about author, licence etc.
%
\bgroup
\lccode"E7="E7
\lccode"EB="EB
\patterns{
2'2
.a1jo.
a1a
1b
.b2
2b.
b2l
2bsh
1c
.c2
2c.
2cj
2cn
2ct
2cj
2ct
2cn
1^^e7
.^^e72
2^^e7.
2^^e7s
^^e72k
1d
d2h
.d2
2d.
d2j
2dn
d2r
2drr
2dt
d2shm
d2h
2dh.
2dhj2dht
2dhsh
2dhj
2dht
dh2r
dh2j
e1a
e3ll
e1u
^^eb1a
1f
.f2
2f.
f2l
f2r
2fs
2ft
3f2sh
2f2t.
1g
.g2
2g.
g2j
2gj.
2gjv
2gl
2gm
2gr
2gt
1h
.h2
2h.
2h.
2hd
2hj
2hm
2hn
2ht
2hrr
i1a
i1e
i1u
.i2k3i
.i2k3j
1j2
.j2
2j.
2j3c2
2j3d
2j3m
2j3p
2j3r
2j3t
2j3v
2j3s
2jf.
j4tp
2jt.
j3sh2m
1k
.k2
2k.
k2j
2kl
2km
2kth.
k2r
2kt
2ks
2ksh
1l
.l2
2l.
2lb
2l^^e7
2lf
2lj
2lm
2ln
l3n2g
2ls
2lt
l2l2
4ll.
2ll3s
4ll3z
2ll3k
4ll3gj
2ll3n
2ll3t
4ll3z
1m
.m2
2m.
m2b
mb2j
mb2l
mb2r
m2j
2m3n2d
2mt
2mr
2m3sh2
2m4sh.
2m1v
1n
.n2
2n.
.ng2r
2nc
2nd
n2dm
n2dv
n2d3sh
2ng
2nk
2nsp
2nsh
n3sh2m
2nt
2nv
2nx
2nz
n2j
2njt
2nj.
2njv
o1i
1p
.p2
2p.
p2j
2pn
2pt
p2je.
2ps
p2r
pa2s3her
.pe2r3af
.p^^eb2r3af
1q
.q2
2q.
2qj
2qk
2qm
2qn
2qt
q2v
1r
.r2
2r.
2rt
2rb2
2r2b3r
2rc
2r^^e7
2rd
2rc2rd
2rf
2rg
2rh
.ri3n2d
2rk
2rl
2rm
2rn
r2n3d2
2rp
2rq
2rs
2r3sh2m
2rdh
r2dht
2r3dr
2rj
2rv
2rz
r2r
.rr2
2rr.
2rrj
2rrk
2rrm
2rrn
2rrt
2rrs
1s
.s2
2s.
2sh.
2sb
2sc
2sd
2sf
2sg
2sj
2sk
2sm
2sn
sn2k
2sp
2ssh
2st
st2r
3s2je2ll
sk2ll
s2ve.
s2h
.sh4
2shm
3sh2mj
2shj
.sh2j
sh2k
2shk.
sh2n
shn4d
sh2p
.sh2q
4sh3k2r
2shq
2sh3nj
2shpr
3sh4pj
3sh4pr
2shr
2shs
2sht
.sh2t
3sh2te.
1t
.t2
4t.
2tk
t2j
2tm
2tn
2tp
2t3sh2m
t2r
2tv
t2h
.th2
2th.
2th^^e7
2ths
2th^^e7
2thf
2thm
2tht
u1ar.
u1a
u1e
1v
.v2
2v.
2vr
v2j
1x
x2h
.x2
2x.
y1
1z
.zb2r
.z2
2z.
2zhd
2zm
2zn
2zj
2zs
2zt
2zv
z3sh2m
z2h
.zh2
}
\egroup
